src/fst/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
LEXICON GAVCCILOGIOVCCI   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          ovcci+Num+Sg+Nom:%>X4#logi#ovcci         K                ;
             ovcci+Num+Ess:#logi#ovcci%>n          K                ;
          ovcci+Num+Sg+Acc:#logi#ovcci             K                ;
          ovcci+Num+Sg+Gen:#logi#ovcci             K                ;
       ovcci+Num+Cmp/SgGen:#logi#ovcci             NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
          ovcci+Num+Sg+Loc:#logi#ovcci%>s          K                ;
 ovcci+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:#logi#ovcci%>n          K                ; ! !SOUTH
          ovcci+Num+Sg+Ill:#logi#okcá%>j           K                ;
     ovcci+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:#logi#ovcci             K                ;
     ovcci+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:#logi#ovcci             K                ;
          ovcci+Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logijn#ovcci%>jn K                ;
          ovcci+Num+Pl+Nom:#logi#ovcci%>t          K                ;
          ovcci+Num+Pl+Acc:#logi#ovcci%>X5jd       K                ;
          ovcci+Num+Pl+Gen:#logi#ovcci%>X5jd       K                ;
     ovcci+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:#logi#ovcci%>X5jd       K                ;
     ovcci+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:#logi#ovcci%>X5jd       K                ;
          ovcci+Num+Pl+Ill:#logi#ovcci%>jde        K                ;
          ovcci+Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logijn#ovcci%>jn K                ;
          ovcci+Num+Pl+Com:#logi#ovcci%>jguin      K                ;

LEXICON GUOKTELOGIOVCCI   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          ovcci+Num+Sg+Nom:e#logi#ovcci             K                ;
             ovcci+Num+Ess:e#logi#ovcci%>n          K                ;
          ovcci+Num+Sg+Acc:e#logi#ovcci             K                ;
          ovcci+Num+Sg+Gen:e#logi#ovcci             K                ;
       ovcci+Num+Cmp/SgGen:e#logi#ovcci             NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
          ovcci+Num+Sg+Loc:e#logi#ovcci%>s          K                ;
 ovcci+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:e#logi#ovcci%>n          K                ; ! !SOUTH
          ovcci+Num+Sg+Ill:e#logi#okcá%>j           K                ;
     ovcci+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:e#logi#ovcci             K                ;
     ovcci+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:e#logi#ovcci             K                ;
          ovcci+Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#logijn#ovcci%>jn K                ;
          ovcci+Num+Pl+Nom:e#logi#ovcci%>t          K                ;
          ovcci+Num+Pl+Acc:e#logi#ovcci%>X5jd       K                ;
          ovcci+Num+Pl+Gen:e#logi#ovcci%>X5jd       K                ;
     ovcci+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:e#logi#ovcci%>X5jd       K                ;
     ovcci+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:e#logi#ovcci%>X5jd       K                ;
          ovcci+Num+Pl+Ill:e#logi#ovcci%>jde        K                ;
          ovcci+Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#logijn#ovcci%>jn K                ;
          ovcci+Num+Pl+Com:e#logi#ovcci%>jguin      K                ;

LEXICON VIHTTALOGIOVCCI   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          ovcci+Num+Sg+Nom:htta#logi#ovcci         K                ;
             ovcci+Num+Ess:htta#logi#ovcci%>n      K                ;
          ovcci+Num+Sg+Acc:htta#logi#ovcci         K                ;
          ovcci+Num+Sg+Gen:htta#logi#ovcci         K                ;
       ovcci+Num+Cmp/SgGen:htta#logi#ovcci         NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
          ovcci+Num+Sg+Loc:htta#logi#ovcci%>s      K                ;
 ovcci+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:htta#logi#ovcci%>n      K                ; ! !SOUTH
          ovcci+Num+Sg+Ill:htta#logi#okcá%>j       K                ;
     ovcci+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:htta#logi#ovcci         K                ;
     ovcci+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:htta#logi#ovcci         K                ;
          ovcci+Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn#logijn#ovcci%>jn K                ;
          ovcci+Num+Pl+Nom:htta#logi#ovcci%>t      K                ;
          ovcci+Num+Pl+Acc:htta#logi#ovcci%>X5jd   K                ;
          ovcci+Num+Pl+Gen:htta#logi#ovcci%>X5jd   K                ;
     ovcci+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:htta#logi#ovcci%>X5jd   K                ;
     ovcci+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:htta#logi#ovcci%>X5jd   K                ;
          ovcci+Num+Pl+Ill:htta#logi#ovcci%>jde    K                ;
          ovcci+Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#logijn#ovcci%>jn K                ;
          ovcci+Num+Pl+Com:htta#logi#ovcci%>jguin  K                ;

LEXICON 21TO99   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
   guoktelogi:guokºt         GUOKTELOGIOVCCI    ;
 njealljelogi:njeallj        GUOKTELOGIOVCCI    ;
   vihttalogi:vi             VIHTTALOGIOVCCI    ;
   guhttalogi:gu             VIHTTALOGIOVCCI    ;
   gávccilogi:gávcci         GAVCCILOGIOVCCI    ;
    gákcilogi:gákci          GAVCCILOGIOVCCI    ;
    ovccilogi:ovcci          GAVCCILOGIOVCCI    ;
